California statutes. Water Code
======================================================================
  Water Code
  State of California
======================================================================

Source: Official California Legislative Information
        https://downloads.leginfo.legislature.ca.gov/
Last Updated by State of California: October 02, 2026


======================================================================



======================================================================

GENERAL PROVISIONS

1.

This act shall be known as the Water Code.

(History: Enacted By Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2.

The provisions of this code, in so far as they are substantially the same as existing statutory provisions relating to the same subject matter, shall be construed as restatements and continuations thereof, and not as new enactments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

3.

All persons who, at the time this code takes effect, hold office under any of the acts repealed by this code, which offices are continued by this code, continue to hold them according to their former tenure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4.

No action or proceeding commenced before this code takes effect, and no right accrued, is affected by this code, but all procedure thereafter taken therein shall conform to the provisions of this code so far as possible.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

5.

Unless the provision or the context otherwise requires, these definitions, rules of construction, and general provisions shall govern the construction of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6.

Division, part, chapter, article, and section headings do not in any manner affect the scope, meaning, or intent of the provisions of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

7.

Whenever a power is granted to, or a duty is imposed upon, a public officer, the power may be exercised or the duty may be performed by a deputy of the officer or by a person authorized, pursuant to law, by the officer, unless this code expressly provides otherwise.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

8.

Writing includes any form of recorded message capable of comprehension by ordinary visual means. Whenever any notice, report, statement, petition, or record is required or authorized by this code, it shall be made in writing in the English language unless it is expressly provided otherwise.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

9.

Whenever reference is made to any portion of this code or of any other law of this State, the reference applies to all amendments and additions heretofore or hereafter made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

10.

“Section” means a section of this code unless some other statute is specifically mentioned. “Subdivision” means a subdivision of the section in which that term occurs unless some other section is expressly mentioned.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

11.

The present tense includes the past and future tenses, and the future, the present.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

12.

The masculine gender includes the feminine and the neuter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

12.2.

“Spouse” includes “registered domestic partner,” as required by Section 297.5 of the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 118.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13.

The singular number includes the plural, and the plural, the singular.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

14.

“County” includes city and county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

15.

“Shall” is mandatory and “may” is permissive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

16.

“Oath” includes affirmation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

17.

“Signature” or “subscription” includes mark when the signer or subscriber can not write, such signer’s or subscriber’s name being written near the mark by a witness who writes his own name near the signer’s or subscriber’s name; but a signature or subscription by mark can be acknowledged or can serve as a signature or subscription to a sworn statement only when two witnesses so sign their own names thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

18.

“State” means the State of California, unless applied to the different parts of the United States. In the latter case, it includes the District of Columbia and the territories.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

19.

“Person” means any person, firm, association, organization, partnership, business trust, corporation, limited liability company, or company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 226.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20.

“United States” means the United States of America, and in relation to any particular matter includes the officers, agents, employees, agencies, or instrumentalities authorized to act in relation thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

21.

If any provision of this code, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of the code, or the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

22.

“Department,” unless otherwise specified, means the Department of Water Resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1956, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

23.

“Director,” unless otherwise specified, means the Director of Water Resources.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1956, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

24.

The standard miner’s inch of water is equivalent to one and one-half cubic feet of water per minute, measured through any aperture or orifice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

25.

“Board,” unless otherwise specified, means the State Water Resources Control Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

26.

For the purposes of this code, “recycled water” or “reclaimed water” has the same meaning as recycled water as defined in subdivision (n) of Section 13050.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 11.5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1. GENERAL STATE POWERS OVER WATER [100. - 550.]



CHAPTER 1. General State Policy [100. - 113.]

100.

It is hereby declared that because of the conditions prevailing in this State the general welfare requires that the water resources of the State be put to beneficial use to the fullest extent of which they are capable, and that the waste or unreasonable use or unreasonable method of use of water be prevented, and that the conservation of such water is to be exercised with a view to the reasonable and beneficial use thereof in the interest of the people and for the public welfare. The right to water or to the use or flow of water in or from any natural stream or watercourse in this State is and shall be limited to such water as shall be reasonably required for the beneficial use to be served, and such right does not and shall not extend to the waste or unreasonable use or unreasonable method of use or unreasonable method of diversion of water.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

100.5.

It is hereby declared to be the established policy of this state that conformity of a use, method of use, or method of diversion of water with local custom shall not be solely determinative of its reasonableness, but shall be considered as one factor to be weighed in the determination of the reasonableness of the use, method of use, or method of diversion of water, within the meaning of Section 2 of Article X of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 933, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

101.

Riparian rights in a stream or watercourse attach to, but to no more than so much of the flow thereof as may be required or used consistently with this and the next preceding section, for the purposes for which such lands are, or may be made adaptable, in view of such reasonable and beneficial uses; provided, however, that nothing in this or the next preceding section shall be construed as depriving any riparian owner of the reasonable use of water of the stream to which his land is riparian under reasonable methods of diversion and use, or of depriving any appropriator of water to which he is lawfully entitled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

102.

All water within the State is the property of the people of the State, but the right to the use of water may be acquired by appropriation in the manner provided by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

103.

In the enactment of this code the Legislature does not intend thereby to effect any change in the law relating to water rights.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

104.

It is hereby declared that the people of the State have a paramount interest in the use of all the water of the State and that the State shall determine what water of the State, surface and underground, can be converted to public use or controlled for public protection.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

105.

It is hereby declared that the protection of the public interest in the development of the water resources of the State is of vital concern to the people of the State and that the State shall determine in what way the water of the State, both surface and underground, should be developed for the greatest public benefit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

106.

It is hereby declared to be the established policy of this State that the use of water for domestic purposes is the highest use of water and that the next highest use is for irrigation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

106.3.

(a) It is hereby declared to be the established policy of the state that every human being has the right to safe, clean, affordable, and accessible water adequate for human consumption, cooking, and sanitary purposes.

(b) All relevant state agencies, including the department, the state board, and the State Department of Public Health, shall consider this state policy
 when revising, adopting, or establishing policies, regulations, and grant criteria when those policies, regulations, and criteria are pertinent to the uses of water described in this section.

(c) This section does not expand any obligation of the state to provide water or
 to require the expenditure of additional resources
 to develop water infrastructure beyond the obligations that may exist pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) This section shall not apply to water supplies for new development.

(e) The implementation of this section shall not infringe on the rights or responsibilities of any public water system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 524, Sec. 1.   (AB 685)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

106.4.

(a) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Bottled water” has the same meaning as defined in Section 111070 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Residential development” has the same meaning as defined in Section 65008 of the Government Code.

(3) “Retail water facility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 111070 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) “Water-vending machine” has the same meaning as defined in Section 111070 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) “Water hauler” has the same meaning as defined in
 Section 111070 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) A city, including a charter city, or a county shall not issue a building permit for the construction of a new residential development where a source of water supply is water transported by a water hauler, bottled water, a water-vending machine, or a retail water facility.

(c) This section does not apply to a residence that will be rebuilt because of a fire or natural disaster.

(d) The Legislature finds and declares that this section addresses a matter of statewide concern and not a municipal affair, as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 612, Sec. 1.   (AB 367)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

106.5.

It is hereby declared to be the established policy of this State that the right of a municipality to acquire and hold rights to the use of water should be protected to the fullest extent necessary for existing and future uses, but that no municipality shall acquire or hold any right to waste water, or to use water for other than municipal purposes, or to prevent the appropriation and application of water in excess of its reasonable and existing needs to useful purposes by others subject to the rights of the municipality to apply such water to municipal uses as and when necessity therefor exists.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1344.)
-------------------------------------------

106.7.

(a) It is hereby declared to be the established policy of this state to support and encourage the development of environmentally compatible small hydroelectric projects as a renewable energy source, provided that the projects do not result in surface disturbances within the following sensitive areas:

(1) Any component of the California Wild and Scenic Rivers System or the National Wild and Scenic Rivers System.

(2) Any river designated for study pursuant to Section 5(a) of the National Wild and Scenic River Act (16 U.S.C. 1276(a)). This paragraph shall not apply to any river which, upon the completion of the study, is not included in the National Wild and Scenic Rivers System.

(3) Any state or federally designated wilderness area.

(4) Any areas designated as a “Critical Condor Habitat” by the United States Fish and Wildlife Service.

(b) State agencies shall not approve small hydroelectric development within the sensitive areas specified in subdivision (a).

(c) Significant adverse impacts associated with small hydroelectric projects shall be identified by those agencies responsible for the preparation of the environmental impact document.

(d) Emphasis on the development of small hydroelectric power generating facilities which are “qualifying small power production facilities” under Section 210 of the Public Utilities Regulatory Policies Act of 1978, shall be on existing dams, diversions, and canals with a sufficient drop so that power may be efficiently generated without significant environmental effects.

(e) For hydroelectric power generating facilities, the applicant shall demonstrate that project revenues will exceed project costs, including the cost of mitigation measures over the life of the project.

(f) Subdivisions (d) and (e) do not apply to projects with a nameplate capacity of less than 100 kilowatts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 807, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

107.

The declaration of the policy of the State in this chapter is not exclusive, and all other or further declarations of policy in this code shall be given their full force and effect.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

108.

It is hereby declared to be the established policy of this State that in the development and completion of any general or co-ordinated plan prepared and published by the Department of Water Resources or any predecessor thereof or successor thereto, all uses, including needs of the area in which the water originates, of water shall be given consideration.

Whenever the Legislature authorizes the construction or acquisition by the State of any project which will develop water for use outside the watershed in which it originates, the Legislature shall at the same time consider the authorization and the construction or acquisition of such other works as may be necessary to develop water to satisfy such of the reasonable ultimate requirements of such watershed as may be needed at the time the export project is authorized or as will be needed within a reasonable time thereafter. The authorization with respect to such additional works may provide for state acquisition or construction, in whole or in part, of any such additional works, or financial assistance to other entities in connection with the acquisition or construction of such works, or a combination thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2063.)
-------------------------------------------

108.5.

(a) It is hereby declared to be the established policy of the state that source watersheds are recognized and defined as integral components of California’s water infrastructure.

(b) (1) As climate change advances, source watersheds that provide the majority of the state’s drinking and irrigated agricultural water are of particular importance to maintaining the reliability, quantity, timing, and quality of California’s environmental, drinking, and agricultural water supply.

(2) Recognizing the critical role of source watersheds in enhancing water supply reliability, the maintenance and repair of source watersheds is eligible for the same forms of financing as other water collection and treatment infrastructure.

(3) Nothing in this section is intended to constrain financing for source watersheds supplying local, state, or federal water systems.

(4) Nothing in this section is intended to supersede federal eligibility requirements or alter any of the following:

(A) Funding criteria or guidelines established for a bond or other measure enacted by the voters.

(B) Funding programs related to pollution control, cleanup, or abatement.

(C) Funding programs for addressing public health emergencies.

(c) Eligible maintenance
 and repair activities pursuant to this section are limited to the following forest ecosystem restoration and conservation activities:

(1) Upland vegetation management to restore the watershed’s productivity and resiliency.

(2) Wet and dry meadow restoration.

(3) Road removal and repair.

(4) Stream channel restoration.

(5) Conservation of private forests to preserve watershed integrity through permanent prevention of land use conversion and improved land management, achieved through, and secured with, conservation easements.

(6) Other projects with a demonstrated likelihood of increasing conditions for water and snow attraction, retention, and release under changing climate conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 695, Sec. 1.   (AB 2480)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

109.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the growing water needs of the state require the use of water in an efficient manner and that the efficient use of water requires certainty in the definition of property rights to the use of water and transferability of such rights. It is hereby declared to be the established policy of this state to facilitate the voluntary transfer of water and water rights where consistent with the public welfare of the place of export and the place of import.

(b) The Legislature hereby directs the Department of Water Resources, the State Water Resources Control Board, and all other appropriate state agencies to encourage voluntary transfers of water and water rights, including, but not limited to, providing technical assistance to persons to identify and implement water conservation measures which will make additional water available for transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 867, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

110.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The use of potable water to irrigate nonfunctional turf is wasteful and incompatible with state policy relating to climate change, water conservation, and reduced reliance on the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta ecosystem.

(2) The Governor reported in August 2022 that climate change will bring significant enduring reductions in California’s water supply and that the state must take steps to respond to this reality.

(3) The State of Nevada enacted AB 356 in 2021 to prohibit the use
 of Colorado River water to irrigate nonfunctional turf on all properties except single-family residences by January 1, 2027.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the irrigation of grasses for agricultural production shall not be limited by requirements to eliminate the use of potable water to irrigate nonfunctional turf.

(c) The Legislature hereby directs all appropriate state agencies to encourage and support the elimination of irrigation of nonfunctional turf with potable water.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 849, Sec. 1.   (AB 1572)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

112.

(a) The efficiency of a reverse osmosis water treatment device means the percentage of water which passes through the water treatment device that is available for subsequent domestic use and which is not discharged directly from the device to the waste disposal system of the residence where the device is used. 

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, after January 1, 1991, no reverse osmosis water treatment device shall be sold, installed, or rented, for residential use, including any general domestic purposes such as drinking, cleaning, washing, or sanitation, unless the device is equipped with an automatic waste shutoff device or, through other equipment design specifications, achieves or exceeds equal or greater water savings than would occur with an automatic shutoff device.

(c) Effective January 1, 1993, any reverse osmosis water treatment device sold, installed, rented, or under service contract prior to January 1, 1991, for residential use shall be retrofit with an automatic waste shutoff device, or, through other equipment design specifications, achieve or exceed equal or greater water savings than would occur with an automatic shutoff device.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 944, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

113.

It is the policy of the state that groundwater resources be managed sustainably for long-term reliability and multiple economic, social, and environmental benefits for current and future beneficial uses. Sustainable groundwater management is best achieved locally through the development, implementation, and updating of plans and programs based on the best available science.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346, Sec. 2.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. State Administration Generally [120. - 190.]



  ARTICLE 1. Department of Water Resources [120. - 148.]

120.

There is in the Resources Agency the Department of Water Resources, which is under the control of an executive officer known as the Director of Water Resources. The director is appointed by the Governor and holds office at the pleasure of the Governor. The appointment of the director is subject to confirmation by the Senate at the next regular or special session of the Legislature, and the refusal or failure of the Senate to confirm the appointment shall create a vacancy in the office. The director shall receive an annual salary as provided for by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and he is a member of the Governor’s Council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2037.)
-------------------------------------------

122.

The director, in addition to being subject to removal from office by the Governor, may be removed from office by the Legislature, by concurrent resolution adopted by a majority vote of all members elected to each house, for dereliction of duty or corruption or incompetency.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 152 by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

123.

Except as provided in Section 179, the department succeeds to and is vested with all of the powers, duties, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction in matters pertaining to water or dams vested in the Department and Director of Public Works, the Division of Water Resources of the Department of Public Works, the State Engineer, the Water Project Authority of the State of California, or any officer of employee thereof. The department also succeeds to and is vested with all of the powers, duties, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction of the Department of Finance under Part 2 (commencing at Section 10500) of Division 6. The department succeeds to and is vested with all of the powers, duties, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction vested in the State Water Resources Board, except as provided in Article 2 (commencing at Section 150) of Chapter 2 of this division.

Any commission or other body heretofore or hereafter created by the Legislature to formulate a compact with a similar commission or body from another state relative to the distribution and use of the waters of any interstate streams or bodies of water, including but not limited to the California Klamath River Commission and the California-Nevada Interstate Compact Commission, shall, in formulating a provision in any such compact for the administration of the terms of the compact, provide that the Department of Water Resources shall be the representative of the State of California for the purpose of such administration.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 153 by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

124.

Except to the extent inconsistent with the provisions of this code, the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing at Section 11150), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code shall govern and apply to the conduct of the Department of Water Resources in every respect the same as if such provisions were herein set forth at length, and whenever in that chapter the term “head of the department” or similar designation occurs, for the purposes of this section it shall mean the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

125.

For the purpose of administration, the director shall organize the department with the approval of the Governor in the manner he deems necessary to segregate and conduct the work of the department properly. With the approval of the Governor, the director may create such divisions and subdivisions as may be necessary and change or abolish them from time to time.

The director with the approval of the Governor may establish branch offices in hydrographic or other regions of the State in order to assure the expeditious conduct of the work of the department in such region, and to assure free and rapid communication of local problems and recommendations to the department and may change or abolish any such branch offices from time to time. Any branch office so established shall be under the control of a branch office manager who, subject to the direction and control of the director, shall represent the department in all matters under the department’s jurisdiction in the region.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 155 by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

126.

There shall be one Deputy Director of Water Resources who shall be a civil executive officer and shall be appointed by the Governor and serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The compensation of the deputy director shall be fixed by the director pursuant to law. The deputy director shall have such duties as shall be assigned, from time to time, by the director, and he shall be responsible to the director for the performance thereof.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 156 by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

127.

The department may employ legal counsel who shall advise the director, represent the department in connection with legal matters before other boards and agencies of the state, and may, when authorized by the Attorney General, represent the department and the state in litigation concerning affairs of the department. In any event, the legal counsel of the department may, with the approval of the director and with the consent of the court before which the action is pending, present to the court the views of the department with respect to the action. Sections 955.4, 955.6, 11041, 11042, 11043, and the first sentence of Section 11157 of the Government Code do not apply to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 174.)
-------------------------------------------

127.5.

The department may utilize the program manager class series that was created for the California Bay-Delta Authority, for positions to manage vital departmental activities, including those relating to climate change mitigation and adaptation, water management, and statewide planning.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 2.   Effective March 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

128.

(a) In times of extraordinary stress and of disaster, resulting from storms and floods, or where damage to watershed lands by forest fires has created an imminent threat of floods and damage by water, mud, or debris upon the occurrence of storms, the department may perform any work required or take any remedial measures necessary to avert, alleviate, repair, or restore damage or destruction to property having a general public and state interest and to protect the health, safety, convenience, and welfare of the general public of the state. In carrying out that work, the department may perform the work itself or through or in cooperation with any other state department or agency, the federal government, or any political subdivision, city, or
 district.

(b) This section is intended to supplement the emergency services of the state, and nothing in this section overrides or supersedes the authority of the Director of Emergency Services to coordinate and supervise state action, upon a declaration of a state of emergency, under the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code) or the Disaster Assistance Act (Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 8680) of that division).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 527.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

130.

The department may prepare, publish, and issue such printed pamphlets and bulletins as the director deems necessary for the dissemination of information to the public concerning the activities of the several divisions of the department. Funds available for the support of the several divisions may, with the approval of the Department of Finance, be used to pay the cost of preparation, publication, and distribution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

131.

The department may employ such assistance as may be necessary for the proper discharge of its duties, and may purchase or rent any necessary supplies, instruments, tools, equipment, and conveniences.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

132.

Where work to be performed, which would otherwise be subject to the State Contract Act, does not lend itself to the preparation of plans and specifications to enable bids to be taken on a lump sum or unit basis, the department may perform such work by the use of rented tools or equipment, either with operators furnished or unoperated. Contracts for such rentals shall not be subject to the State Contract Act, but shall be subject to all of the provisions of Section 136.5 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

133.

The department may cooperate and contract with any agency of the State or of the United States in order to carry out its powers and purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 947.)
-------------------------------------------

134.

The department may expend money appropriated for the administration of the laws the enforcement of which is committed to the department. The department may expend such money for the use, support, or maintenance of any appropriate state agency within the department.

Such expenditures by the department shall be made in accordance with law in carrying on the work for which the appropriations were made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

134.5.

The Director of Finance shall administratively establish positions necessary to implement activities funded by the appropriations made in Division 33 (commencing with Section 83000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 3.   Effective March 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

135.

The Water Resources Revolving Fund in the State Treasury is continued in existence. With the approval of the Department of Finance, there shall be transferred to, or deposited in, the fund all money appropriated, contributed, or made available from any source, including sources other than state appropriations, for expenditure on work within the powers and duties of the Department of Water Resources, including but not limited to services, new construction, major construction and equipment, minor construction, maintenance, improvements and equipment, hydraulic or other improvement projects, investigations, surveys, experiments, and reports, as authorized by the state agency for which such an appropriation is made or, as to funds from sources other than state appropriations, as may be authorized by written agreement between the contributor or contributors of such funds and the Department of Water Resources (or any predecessor), when approved by the Department of Finance.

Money so transferred or deposited is available for expenditure by the Department of Water Resources, for the purposes for which appropriated, contributed, or made available, without regard to fiscal years and irrespective of the provisions of Section 16304 of the Government Code. The Department of Water Resources may withdraw from the fund for use in work for other public agencies, local, state, or federal, such sums as may be necessary for such work where the money to be paid by such other agencies is not deposited in said fund in advance of the work being done.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1848.)
-------------------------------------------

135.1.

All sums in the Water Resources Revolving Fund in the State Treasury, maintained pursuant to Section 135, in a sum not to exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000), the source of which is attributable to the General Fund, and which are held for the purposes of a payroll reserve for vacation, leave, compensating time off, and like purposes, and which, in the judgment of the Department of Finance, are determined to be surplus to the requirements for payments for such purposes on a current basis, shall be available, during the 1968–1969 fiscal year, as follows:

(a) Not exceeding two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for transfer to the State Water Quality Control Fund; except that any such sum shall be retransferred to the General Fund from the State Water Quality Control Fund in the 1969–1970 fiscal year.

(b) Not exceeding five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for transfer to the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1039.)
-------------------------------------------

136.

The Department of Water Resources shall file against the Water Resources Revolving Fund all claims covering expenditures incurred in connection with services, new construction, major construction and equipment, minor construction, maintenance, improvements and equipment, hydraulic or other improvement projects, investigations, surveys, experiments and reports, and the State Controller shall draw his warrant therefor against that fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

137.

The Department of Water Resources shall keep a record of all expenditures chargeable against each specific portion of the revolving fund, and any unused balance in any portion of the fund shall on approval by the Department of Finance be withdrawn from the revolving fund and transferred to the credit of the appropriation from which it was transferred or, as to funds from other than state appropriations, be paid out or refunded as provided in the agreement relating to the contributions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

138.

The director may authorize the refund of moneys received or collected by the department in payment of fees, licenses, permits, tolls, or for rentals, property or services, wherein the license, permit, rental, property or service cannot lawfully be issued, furnished, or transferred to the person making the payment, or in cases where the payment in whole or in part represents overpayment or payment in duplicate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

138.10.

(a) On or before January 1, 2006, the director, in collaboration with the Secretary of Interior or his or her designee, shall prepare a plan to meet the existing permit and license conditions for which the department has an obligation, as described in the State Water Resources Control Board Decision No. 1641.

(b) The plan shall be designed to achieve compliance with the permit and license conditions described in subdivision (a). The director shall prepare the plan, and submit copies of the plan to the board and the California Bay-Delta Authority, prior to increasing the existing permitted diversion rate at the State Water Project’s Harvey O. Banks Pumping Plant.

(c) Nothing in this section limits or restricts the department in its operation of the State Water Project due to failure of other water rights permittees or licensees to meet water quality conditions of their respective permits or licenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 612, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

138.12.
